fi: Telinemuoto: 19 tuuman telinemalli 1U; 19 tuuman telinemalli 2U; 19 tuuman telinemalli 3U+; 500-sarjan moduuli; Erillinen pöytämalli; Puolitelineen pöytämalli; Lunchbox; Kannettava/kenttälaite; Pöydällä pidettävä; Muu
it: Formato rack: Rack 19 pollici 1U; Rack 19 pollici 2U; Rack 19 pollici 3U+; Modulo serie 500; Desktop autonomo; Mezzo rack desktop; Lunchbox; Portatile/da campo; Da tavolo; Altro
tr: Raf formatı: 19 inç rack montaj 1U; 19 inç rack montaj 2U; 19 inç rack montaj 3U+; 500 serisi modül; Masaüstü bağımsız; Yarım rack masaüstü; Lunchbox; Taşınabilir/Saha; Masaüstü; Diğer
bg-BG: Форма на стойката: 19-инчов рак монтаж 1U; 19-инчов рак монтаж 2U; 19-инчов рак монтаж 3U+; Модул от серия 500; Настолен самостоятелен; Половин рак настолен; Лънчбокс; Преносим/Полеви; Плот за маса; Други
pt-PT: Formato de rack: Montagem em rack de 19 polegadas 1U; Montagem em rack de 19 polegadas 2U; Montagem em rack de 19 polegadas 3U+; Módulo série 500; Mesa autónomo; Meia rack de mesa; Lunchbox; Portátil/Campo; Tampo de mesa; Outro
sl-SI: Format stojala: 19-palčni stenski nosilec 1U; 19-palčni stenski nosilec 2U; 19-palčni stenski nosilec 3U+; Modul serije 500; Namizni samostojen; Pol-stenski namizni; Prenosni kovček; Prenosni/terenski; Namizni; Drugo
pt-BR: Formato do rack: Rack 19 polegadas 1U; Rack 19 polegadas 2U; Rack 19 polegadas 3U+; Módulo série 500; Desktop autônomo; Meia rack desktop; Lunchbox; Portátil/campo; Tampo de mesa; Outro
pl: Format szafy rack: Montaż rack 19 cali 1U; Montaż rack 19 cali 2U; Montaż rack 19 cali 3U+; Moduł serii 500; Samodzielny biurkowy; Półrack biurkowy; Lunchbox; Przenośny/terenowy; Blat stołu; Inne
ko: 랙 형식: 19인치 랙마운트 1U; 19인치 랙마운트 2U; 19인치 랙마운트 3U+; 500 시리즈 모듈; 데스크톱 스탠드얼론; 하프 랙 데스크톱; 런치박스; 휴대용/필드용; 테이블탑; 기타
fr: Format du rack: Rack 19 pouces 1U; Rack 19 pouces 2U; Rack 19 pouces 3U+; Module série 500; Bureau autonome; Demi-rack bureau; Lunchbox; Portable/Terrain; De table; Autre
nb: Rack format: 19-tommers rackmontering 1U; 19-tommers rackmontering 2U; 19-tommers rackmontering 3U+; 500-serie modul; Frittstående bordmodell; Halvrack bordmodell; Matboks; Bærbar/felt; Bordplate; Annet
es: Formato de rack: Montaje en rack de 19 pulgadas 1U; Montaje en rack de 19 pulgadas 2U; Montaje en rack de 19 pulgadas 3U+; Módulo serie 500; Sobremesa independiente; Medio rack de sobremesa; Caja compacta; Portátil/Campo; Sobremesa; Otros
zh-CN: 机架形式: 19 英寸机架式 1U; 19 英寸机架式 2U; 19 英寸机架式 3U+; 500 系列模块; 桌面独立式; 半机架桌面式; 便携式机箱; 便携式/现场用; 桌面; 其他
lt-LT: Stelažo formatas: 19 colių montavimas į stelažą 1U; 19 colių montavimas į stelažą 2U; 19 colių montavimas į stelažą 3U+; 500 serijos modulis; Stalinis savarankiškas; Pusė stelažo stalinis; Dėžutė; Nešiojamas/lauko; Stalinis; Kita
de: Rack‑Format: 19-Zoll-Rackmontage 1HE; 19-Zoll-Rackmontage 2HE; 19-Zoll-Rackmontage 3HE+; 500er-Serie-Modul; Desktop eigenständig; Halbrack Desktop; Lunchbox; Tragbar/Feld; Tischgerät; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Format stalka: 19-inčna rack montaža 1U; 19-inčna rack montaža 2U; 19-inčna rack montaža 3U+; Modul serije 500; Samostalni stolni; Stolni polu-rack; Lunchbox; Prijenosni/terenski; Stolni; Ostalo
hu: Állványformátum: 19 hüvelykes rack szerelvény 1U; 19 hüvelykes rack szerelvény 2U; 19 hüvelykes rack szerelvény 3U+; 500-as sorozatú modul; Asztali önálló; Félrack asztali; Lunchbox; Hordozható/terepi; Asztali; Egyéb
ja: ラック形式: 19 インチラックマウント 1U; 19 インチラックマウント 2U; 19 インチラックマウント 3U+; 500 シリーズモジュール; デスクトップスタンドアロン; ハーフラックデスクトップ; ランチボックス; ポータブル/フィールド; 卓上; その他
nl: Rack formaat: 19-inch rackmontage 1U; 19-inch rackmontage 2U; 19-inch rackmontage 3U+; 500-serie module; Desktop zelfstandig; Half-rack desktop; Lunchbox; Draagbaar/veld; Tafelblad; Andere
th: รูปแบบแร็ค: แร็กเมาท์ 19 นิ้ว 1U; แร็กเมาท์ 19 นิ้ว 2U; แร็กเมาท์ 19 นิ้ว 3U+; โมดูล 500 ซีรีส์; เดสก์ท็อปแบบอิสระ; เดสก์ท็อปครึ่งแร็ก; ลันช์บ็อกซ์; พกพา/ภาคสนาม; วางของได้; อื่นๆ
el: Μορφή ραφιού: Rackmount 19 ιντσών 1U; Rackmount 19 ιντσών 2U; Rackmount 19 ιντσών 3U+; Μονάδα σειράς 500; Αυτόνομο επιτραπέζιο; Μισό rack επιτραπέζιο; Lunchbox; Φορητό/πεδίου; Επιτραπέζια; Άλλο
ru: Формат стойки: 19-дюймовый стоечный 1U; 19-дюймовый стоечный 2U; 19-дюймовый стоечный 3U+; Модуль серии 500; Настольный автономный; Настольный полустоечный; Ланчбокс; Портативный/полевой; Настольный; Другой
cs: Formát racku: 19palcový rackmount 1U; 19palcový rackmount 2U; 19palcový rackmount 3U+; 500-series modul; Stolní samostatný; Poloviční rack stolní; Lunchbox; Přenosný/terénní; Deska stolu; Jiné
vi: Định dạng giá đỡ: Gắn rack 19 inch 1U; Gắn rack 19 inch 2U; Gắn rack 19 inch 3U+; Module dòng 500; Để bàn độc lập; Nửa rack để bàn; Lunchbox; Di động/Ngoài trời; Trên mặt bàn; Khác
ro-RO: Format raft: Montaj în rack de 19 inchi 1U; Montaj în rack de 19 inchi 2U; Montaj în rack de 19 inchi 3U+; Modul seria 500; Desktop independent; Desktop jumătate de rack; Lunchbox; Portabil/de teren; Blat; Altele
zh-TW: 機架形式: 19 英寸機架式 1U; 19 英寸機架式 2U; 19 英寸機架式 3U+; 500 系列模組; 桌上型獨立式; 半機架桌上型; 便攜箱式; 可攜式/戶外型; 桌上型; 其他
sk-SK: Formát stojana: 19-palcový rackový 1U; 19-palcový rackový 2U; 19-palcový rackový 3U+; Modul série 500; Stolný samostatný; Polovičný rack stolný; Lunchbox; Prenosný/terénny; Stolový; Iné
sv: Rackformat: 19-tums rackmonterad 1U; 19-tums rackmonterad 2U; 19-tums rackmonterad 3U+; 500-serie modul; Bordsstående fristående; Halvrack bordsstående; Lunchbox; Bärbar/fält; Bordsskiva; Övrigt
da: Rack-format: 19-tommer rackmonteret 1U; 19-tommer rackmonteret 2U; 19-tommer rackmonteret 3U+; 500-serie modul; Desktop selvstændigt; Halv-rack desktop; Lunchbox; Bærbar/felt; Bordplade; Andet
en: Rack format: 19-inch rackmount 1U; 19-inch rackmount 2U; 19-inch rackmount 3U+; 500-series module; Desktop standalone; Half-rack desktop; Lunchbox; Portable/Field; Tabletop; Other